Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 11

Special Elections

Subchapter 1

— Elections to Fill Vacancies

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 1185, §
21: Oct. 2, 2011.

7-11-101. Calling elections to fill vacancies.

All special elections and other elections to fill a vacancy in an office shall be called by proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document of the appropriate constituted authority.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.

7-11-102. Content of calling document.

The proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document of the appropriate constituted authority calling a special election or other election to fill a vacancy in an office shall set forth:

(1)

The date of the election;

(2)

The date of the special primary election, if any;

(3)

The date of the special primary runoff election, if any is required;

(4)

The deadline for filing as a party candidate with the county clerk or Secretary of State, as the case may be;

(5)

The deadline for party conventions to select nominees if applicable;

(6)

The deadline for parties to issue certificates of nomination or certified lists of nominees, as the case may be, if applicable;

(7)

The deadline for candidates to file certificates of nomination, if applicable, with the county clerk or Secretary of State, as the case may be;

(8)

The deadline for filing as an independent candidate and the period in which petitions for independent candidacy may be circulated;

(9)

The deadline for filing as a write-in candidate if applicable;

(10)

The deadline for drawing for ballot position by the county board of election commissioners; and

(11)

The date the election shall be certified by the county board of election commissioners in each county in which the election takes place and, if applicable, by the Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.

7-11-103. Filling vacancies in state, federal, or district offices.

(a)

The proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document of the appropriate constituted authority calling a special election to fill a state, federal, or district office shall be filed with the Secretary of State, who shall immediately transmit the document to the county board of election commissioners of each county where the special election shall be held.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners shall cause the proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document to be published as soon as practicable in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the special election is held.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.

7-11-104. Filling vacancies in local offices.

(a)

The proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document of the appropriate constituted authority calling a special election to fill a local office shall be filed with the county clerk of the county administering the election, who shall immediately transmit the document to the county board of election commissioners of each county where the special election shall be held.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners shall cause the proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document to be published as soon as practicable in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the special election is held.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.

7-11-105. Special elections to be held on the second Tuesday of a month — Exceptions — Separate ballots.

(a)

Except as provided in this chapter, all special elections to fill vacancies in office and associated special primary elections shall be held on the second Tuesday of any month.

(b)

A special election scheduled to occur in a month in which the second Tuesday of the month is a legal holiday shall be held on the third Tuesday of the month.

(c)(1)

Special elections held in months in which a preferential primary election, general primary election, or general election is scheduled to occur shall be held on the date of the general primary election, preferential primary election, or general election.

(2)

If a special election to fill a vacancy in office is held on the date of the preferential primary election or general primary election, the names of the candidates in the special election shall be included on the ballot of each political party, and the portion of the ballot on which the special election appears shall be labeled with a heading stating “SPECIAL ELECTION FOR
__________” with the name of the office set out in the heading.

(3)

Separate ballots containing the names of the candidates to be voted on at the special election or nonpartisan election and any other measures or questions that may be presented for a vote shall be prepared and made available to voters requesting a separate ballot.

(4)(A)

A voter shall not be required to vote in a political party's preferential primary election or general primary election in order to be able to vote in the special election.

(B)(i)

If the special election is held at the same time as the general election, the names of the candidates in the special election shall be included on the general election ballot, and the portion of the ballot on which the special election appears shall be labeled with a heading stating “SPECIAL ELECTION FOR
__________” with the name of the office set out in the heading.

(ii)

The county board of election commissioners may include the special election on a separate ballot if the special election is held at the same time as the general election and the county board of election commissioners determines that a separate ballot is necessary to avoid voter confusion.

(d)(1)

A special election to fill a vacancy in office shall be held not less than seventy (70) days following the date established in the proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document for drawing for ballot position when the special election is to be held on the date of the preferential primary election, general primary election, or general election.

(2)

If a special election to fill a vacancy in office is not held at the same time as a preferential primary election, general primary election, or general election, the special election shall be held not less than sixty (60) days following the date established in the proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document for drawing for ballot position.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47; 2011, No. 1185, § 15; 2013, No. 1110, § 13; 2017, No. 1088, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “seventy (70)” for “sixty-five (65)” in (e)(1); and substituted “sixty (60)” for “fifty (50)” in (e)(2).

The 2013 amendment substituted “nonpartisan election” for “nonpartisan judicial elections, if applicable” in (d)(3) [now (c)(3)].

The 2017 amendment deleted former (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; inserted “general primary election” twice in (c)(1), (d)(1) and (d)(2); inserted “or general primary election” in (c)(2); substituted “preferential primary election or general primary election” for “preferential primary” in (c)(4)(A); and made stylistic changes.

7-11-106. Special primary elections held in conjunction with regularly scheduled primary election — Separate ballots optional.

(a)

When a special primary election is held on the date of the preferential primary or general primary election, the candidates to be voted upon at the special primary election shall be included on the ballot of each political party, and the portion of the ballot on which the special primary election appears shall be labeled with a heading stating “SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION FOR
__________” with the name of the party for which nomination is sought and the office set out in the heading.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners may include the special primary election on a separate ballot if the special primary election is held at the same time as a preferential primary election or general primary election and the county board of election commissioners determines that a separate ballot is necessary to avoid voter confusion.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47; 2017, No. 1088, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “preferential primary or general primary election” for “preferential primary election” in (a); and inserted “or general primary election” in (b).

7-11-107. Unopposed candidates.

(a)(1)

If there is only one (1) candidate after all deadlines for filing as a candidate have passed in a special election to fill a vacancy and if no other office or issue is on the ballot, the county board of election commissioners may declare and certify the candidate as elected in the same manner as if the candidate had been voted upon at the election.

(2)

If there is only one (1) candidate after all deadlines for filing as a candidate have passed in a special primary election to fill a vacancy, the county board of election commissioners shall certify the candidate as the nominee of the political party without holding a special primary election for the political party.

(b)

If there is only one (1) candidate for municipal office after all the deadlines for filing as a candidate have passed in a special election to fill a vacancy and if no other office or issue is on the ballot, the county board of election commissioners may declare and certify the candidate as elected in the same manner as if the candidate had been voted upon at the election.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47; 2013, No. 580, § 1; 2015, No. 1244, § 3; 2017, No. 730, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment redesignated the former introductory language of (a) as the introductory language of (a)(1) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; deleted “or special primary election” following “special election” in the introductory language of (a)(1); and added (a)(2).

The 2015 amendment added (a)(1)(C) and (c).

The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

Subchapter 2

— Special Elections on Measures and Questions

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 1185, §
21: Oct. 2, 2011.

7-11-201. Calling special elections on measures or questions.

Except for special school elections, all special elections on measures or questions referred to the voters by governmental entities as authorized by law shall be called by proclamation, ordinance, statute, resolution, order, or other authorized document of the properly constituted authority as required by law.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.

7-11-202. Calling special elections on state measures or questions.

(a)

The document under §7-11-201 calling the special election on a state measure or question shall be filed with the Secretary of State, who shall immediately transmit the document to the county board of election commissioners in each county where the special election is to be held.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners shall publish the document as soon as practicable in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the special election is held.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.

7-11-203. Calling special elections on local measures or questions.

(a)

The document under §7-11-201 calling the special election on a local measure or question shall be filed with the county clerk of the county administering the election, who shall immediately transmit the document to the county board of election commissioners in each county where the special election is to be held.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners shall publish the document as soon as practicable in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the special election is held.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.

7-11-204. Content of calling document.

The proclamation, ordinance, statute, resolution, order, or other authorized document of the properly constituted authority calling the special election shall state:

(1)

The date of the special election;

(2)

The full text of any measure or question for which the election is called;

(3)

The ballot title, if any, for the measure or question for which the election is called; and

(4)

Any other information required by law.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.

7-11-205. Dates of special elections on measures and questions — Exceptions — Separate ballots.

(a)(1)(A)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, all special elections on measures or questions shall be held on the second Tuesday of any month, except special elections held under this section in a month in which a preferential primary election, general primary election, or general election is scheduled to occur, which shall be held on the date of the preferential primary election, general primary election, or general election.

(B)

Special elections scheduled to occur in a month in which the second Tuesday is a legal holiday shall be held on the third Tuesday of the month.

(2)(A)

If a special election is held on the date of the preferential primary election, the issue or issues to be voted upon at the special election shall be included on the ballot of each political party.

(B)

The portion of the ballot containing the special election shall be labeled with a heading stating “SPECIAL ELECTION ON
” with a brief description of the measure or question to be decided in the election.

(3)

Separate ballots containing the issue or issues to be voted on at the special election and candidates for nonpartisan judicial office shall be prepared and made available to voters requesting a separate ballot.

(4)

A voter shall not be required to vote in a political party's preferential primary in order to be able to vote in the special election.

(b)(1)

A special election shall be held not less than seventy (70) days following the date that the proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document is filed with the county clerk when the special election is to be held on the date of the preferential primary election or general election.

(2)

If the special election is not held at the same time as a preferential primary election or general election, the special election shall be held not less than sixty (60) days following the date that the proclamation, ordinance, resolution, order, or other authorized document is filed with the county clerk.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47; 2011, No. 1185, § 16; 2017, No. 1088, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “seventy (70)” for “sixty-five (65)” in (b)(1), and substituted “sixty (60)” for “fifty (50)” in (b)(2).

The 2017 amendment inserted “general primary election” twice in (a)(1)(A); redesignated former (a)(1)(B)(i) as present (a)(1)(B); and deleted former (a)(1)(B)(ii); and made stylistic changes.

Subchapter 3

— Certain Procedures for Special Elections

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

7-11-301. Law governing special elections.

In cases of circumstances or procedures that may arise in connection with any special election for which there is no provision in law governing the circumstances or procedures, the special election shall be governed by:

(1)

The general election laws of this state; or

(2)

In the case of special primary elections, the primary election laws of this state.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.

7-11-302. Special procedures for vacancies filled under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 29.

Whenever a vacancy in office is to be filled under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 29, the following shall apply:

(1)

The Governor shall issue a proclamation calling an election to fill a vacancy;

(2)

If the vacancy occurs less than one hundred eighty (180) days before a general election at which the vacancy is to be filled and the position is one that may be filled by partisan election, the political parties shall choose their nominees at a convention of delegates held in accordance with the party rules for the convention;

(3)

If the vacancy occurs more than one hundred eighty (180) days before the general election and is a position that may be filled by partisan election, the Governor shall certify in writing to the state committees of the respective political parties the fact of vacancy and shall request the respective state committees to make a determination and notify him or her in writing within ten (10) days with respect to whether the political parties desire to hold a special primary election or a convention of delegates under party rules to choose nominees;

(4)

If the state committee of any political party shall timely notify the Governor that it chooses to hold a special primary election, it is mandatory that any political party desiring to choose a nominee shall choose the nominee at a special primary election, and the Governor's proclamation shall set dates for both the special primary election and for any runoff primary election to be held if no candidate receives a majority of the vote at the special primary election; and

(5)

If no state committee of any political party timely notifies the Governor of the desire to hold either a primary election or convention of delegates, the Governor, in issuing his or her proclamation calling for the special election, shall declare that the nominee of any political party shall be chosen at a convention of delegates.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.

7-11-303. Notice.

In addition to the publication of the calling document, notice of special elections under this chapter shall be published and posted under §§7-5-202 and7-5-206.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 47.